engredup.foma
r# Our lexicon

read lexc engredup.lexc
define Lex

def C [b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|x];
def V [a|e|i|o|u];

# Define sibilants orthographically
def Sib [s | s h | z | x | c h ];

def MarkReduplicator  ;
def InsertReduplicand ;
def RemoveMarks ;

# e-epenthesis rule: bus+s > buses, etc.
def ERule "+" -> e || Sib _ Sib ;
def YRule y -> i e || C _ "+" ;
def Cleanup "+" -> 0 ;

def Grammar _eq(Lex .o. MarkReduplicator .o. InsertReduplicand, %[, %]) .o. RemoveMarks .o. ERule .o. YRule .o. Cleanup ;

regex Grammar;
